Tennessee, session 114, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 50, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) All contracts entered into between an existing personal seat license (PSL)
holder of ten (10) or more years and a professional sports franchise for the purchase of
a subsequent PSL with an upgraded or improved seating classification must include a
provision that enables the PSL holder to purchase the subsequent PSL for the same
price as the previous PSL.
(b) Subsection (a) applies to:
(1) Contracts for PSL's in stadiums with a seating capacity of at least
sixty-five thousand (65,000) located in any county having a metropolitan form of
government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000),
according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and
(2) All contracts for subsequent PSL purchases entered into on or after
the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1151
003222
- 1 -